District of Columbia statutes.
44-1714

Appropriations.

Such appropriations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are authorized.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 282, Pub. L. 85-87, § 16

History

1981 Ed., § 2-714.
1973 Ed., § 2-2114.

Prior Codifications